Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-4303
Imposition of tax; rates.

(1) A tax is hereby imposed on marijuana and controlled substances at the following rates:

(a) On each ounce of marijuana or each portion of an ounce, one hundred dollars;

(b) On each gram or portion of a gram of a controlled substance that is customarily sold by weight or volume, one hundred fifty dollars; or

(c) On each fifty dosage units or portion thereof of a controlled substance that is not customarily sold by weight, five hundred dollars.

(2) For purposes of calculating the tax under this section, marijuana or any controlled substance that is customarily sold by weight or volume shall be measured by the weight of the substance in the dealer's possession. The weight shall be the actual weight, if known, or the estimated weight as determined by the Nebraska State Patrol or other law enforcement agency. Such determination shall be presumed to be the weight of such marijuana or controlled substances for purposes of sections 77-4301 to 77-4316.

(3) The tax shall not be imposed upon a person registered or otherwise lawfully in possession of marijuana or a controlled substance pursuant to Chapter 28, article 4.

Laws 1990, LB 260, § 3;

Laws 1991, LB 773, § 27.

The tax levied by Nebraska's Marijuana and Controlled Substances Tax Act is an excise tax and need not be levied by valuation. State v. Garza, 242 Neb. 573, 496 N.W.2d 448 (1993).